California statutes. Labor Code
(a) Notwithstanding Section 5307.1, the administrative director shall adopt, after public hearings, a schedule for payment of home health care services provided in accordance with Section 4600 that are not covered by a Medicare fee schedule and are not otherwise covered by the official medical fee schedule adopted pursuant to Section 5307.1. The schedule shall set forth fees and requirements for service providers, and may be based upon, but is not limited to, being based upon, either of the following:

(1) The maximum service hours and fees as set forth in regulations adopted pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) A state or federal home health care services fee schedule other than the schedule described in paragraph (1), including a fee schedule authorized for purposes of the Medi-Cal program or a fee schedule administered by the federal Office of Workers’ Compensation Programs.

(b) Fees shall not be provided for any services, including any services provided by a member of the employee’s household, to the extent the services had been regularly performed in the same manner and to the same degree prior to the date of injury. If appropriate, attorney’s fees for recovery of home health care services fees under this section may be awarded in accordance with Section 4906 and any applicable rules or regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 542, Sec. 5.   (SB 542)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5307.9.

On or before December 31, 2013, the administrative director, in consultation with the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation, shall adopt, after public hearings, a schedule of reasonable maximum fees payable for copy and related services, including, but not limited to, records or documents that have been reproduced or recorded in paper, electronic, film, digital, or other format. The schedule shall specify the services allowed and shall require specificity in billing for these services, and shall not allow for payment for services provided within 30 days of a request by an injured worker or his or her authorized representative to an employer, claims administrator, or workers’ compensation insurer for copies of records in the employer’s, claims administrator’s, or workers’ compensation insurer’s possession that
 are relevant to the employee’s claim. The schedule shall be applicable regardless of whether payments of copy service costs are claimed under the authority of Section 4600, 4620, or 5811, or any other authority except a contract between the employer and the copy service provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 77.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5308.

The appeals board has jurisdiction to determine controversies arising out of insurance policies issued to self-employing persons, conferring benefits identical with those prescribed by this division.

The appeals board may try and determine matters referred to it by the parties under the provisions of Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, with respect to controversies arising out of insurance issued to self-employing persons under the provisions of this division. Such controversies may be submitted to it by the signed agreement of the parties, or by the application of one party and the submission of the other to its jurisdiction, with or without an express request for arbitration.

The State Compensation Insurance Fund, when the consent of the other party is obtained, shall submit to the appeals board all controversies susceptible of being arbitrated under this section.

In acting as arbitrator under this section, the appeals board has all the powers which it may lawfully exercise in compensation cases, and its findings and award upon such arbitration have the same conclusiveness and are subject to the same mode of reopening, review, and enforcement as in compensation cases. No fee or cost shall be charged by the appeals board for arbitrating the issues presented under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

5309.

The appeals board may, in accordance with rules of practice and procedure which it shall adopt and upon the agreement of the parties, on the application of either, or of its own motion, and with or without notice, direct and order a workers’ compensation judge:

(a) To try the issues in any proceeding before it, whether of fact or of law, and make and file a finding, order, decision, or award based thereon.

(b) To hold hearings and ascertain facts necessary to enable the appeals board to determine any proceeding or to make any order, decision, or award that the appeals board is authorized to make under Divisions 4 or 5, or necessary for the information of the appeals board.

(c) To issue writs or summons, warrants of attachment, warrants of commitment, and all necessary process in proceedings for direct and hybrid contempt in a like manner and to the same extent as courts of record. For the purposes of this section, “hybrid contempt” means a charge of contempt which arises from events occurring in the immediate presence of the workers’ compensation judge for reasons which occur outside the presence of the workers’ compensation judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5310.

The appeals board may appoint one or more workers’ compensation administrative law judges in any proceeding, as it may deem necessary or advisable, and may refer, remove to itself, or transfer to a workers’ compensation administrative law judge the proceedings on any claim. The administrative director may appoint workers’ compensation administrative law judges. Any workers’ compensation administrative law judge appointed by the administrative director has the powers, jurisdiction, and authority granted by law, by the order of appointment, and by the rules of the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 13.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5311.

Any party to the proceeding may object to the reference of the proceeding to a particular workers’ compensation judge upon any one or more of the grounds specified in Section 641 of the Code of Civil Procedure and the objection shall be heard and disposed of by the appeals board. Affidavits may be read and witnesses examined as to the objections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

5311.5.

The administrative director shall require all workers’ compensation administrative law judges to participate in continuing education to further their abilities as workers’ compensation administrative law judges, including courses in ethics and conflict of interest. The director may coordinate the requirements with those imposed upon attorneys by the State Bar in order that the requirements may be consistent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 14.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5312.

Before entering upon his or her duties, the workers’ compensation judge shall be sworn, before an officer authorized to administer oaths, faithfully and fairly to hear and determine the matters and issues referred to him or her, to make just findings and to report according to his or her understanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

5313.

The appeals board or the workers’ compensation judge shall, within 30 days after the case is submitted, make and file findings upon all facts involved in the controversy and an award, order, or decision stating the determination as to the rights of the parties. Together with the findings, decision, order or award there shall be served upon all the parties to the proceedings a summary of the evidence received and relied upon and the reasons or grounds upon which the determination was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

5315.

Within 60 days after the filing of the findings, decision, order or award, the appeals board may confirm, adopt, modify or set aside the findings, order, decision, or award of a workers’ compensation judge and may, with or without further proceedings, and with or without notice, enter its order, findings, decision, or award based upon the record in the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

5316.

Any notice, order, or decision required by this division to be served upon any person either before, during, or after the institution of any proceeding before the appeals board, may be served in the manner provided by Chapter 5, Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, unless otherwise directed by the appeals board. In the latter event the document shall be served in accordance with the order or direction of the appeals board. The appeals board may, in the cases mentioned in the Code of Civil Procedure, order service to be made by publication of notice of time and place of hearing. Where service is ordered to be made by publication the date of the hearing may be fixed at more than 30 days from the date of filing the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5317.

Any such notice, order or decision affecting the State or any county, city, school district, or public corporation therein, shall be served upon the person upon whom the service of similar notices, orders, or decisions is authorized by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Limitations of Proceedings [5400. - 5413.]

5400.

Except as provided by sections 5402 and 5403, no claim to recover compensation under this division shall be maintained unless within thirty days after the occurrence of the injury which is claimed to have caused the disability or death, there is served upon the employer notice in writing, signed by the person injured or someone in his behalf, or in case of the death of the person injured, by a dependent or someone in the dependent’s behalf.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5401.

(a) Within one working day of receiving notice or knowledge of injury under Section 5400 or 5402, which injury results in lost time beyond the employee’s work shift at the time of injury or which results in medical treatment beyond first aid, the employer shall provide, personally or by first-class mail, a claim form and a notice of potential eligibility for benefits under this division to the injured employee, or in the case of death, to his or her dependents. As used in this subdivision, “first aid” means any one-time treatment, and any followup visit for the purpose of observation of minor scratches, cuts, burns, splinters, or other minor industrial injury, which do not ordinarily require medical care. This one-time treatment, and followup visit
 for the purpose of observation, is considered first aid even though provided by a physician or registered professional personnel. “Minor industrial injury” shall not include serious exposure to a hazardous substance as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 6302. The claim form shall request the injured employee’s name and address, social security number, the time and address where the injury occurred, and the nature of and part of the body affected by the injury. Claim forms shall be available at district offices of the Employment Development Department and the division. Claim forms may be made available to the employee from any other source.

(b) Insofar as practicable, the notice of potential eligibility for benefits required by this section and the claim form shall be a single document and shall instruct the injured employee to fully read the notice of potential eligibility. The form and content of the notice and claim form shall be
 prescribed by the administrative director after consultation with the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation. The notice shall be easily understandable and available in both English and Spanish. The content shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The procedure to be used to commence proceedings for the collection of compensation for the purposes of this chapter.

(2) A description of the different types of workers’ compensation benefits.

(3) What happens to the claim form after it is filed.

(4) From whom the employee can obtain medical care for the injury.

(5) The role and function of the primary treating physician.

(6) The rights of an employee to select and change the treating physician pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3550 and Section 4600.

(7) How to get medical care while the claim is pending.

(8) The protections against discrimination provided pursuant to Section 132a.

(9) The following written statements:

(A) You have a right to disagree with decisions affecting your claim.

(B) To obtain important information about the workers’ compensation claims process and your rights and obligations, go to [applicable Internet Web site(s)], or contact an information and assistance (I&A) officer of the state Division of Workers’
 Compensation. You can also hear recorded information and a list of local I&A offices by calling [applicable information and assistance telephone number(s)].

(C) You can consult an attorney. Most attorneys offer one free consultation. If you decide to hire an attorney, his or her fee will be taken out of some of your benefits. For names of workers’ compensation attorneys, call the State Bar of California at [telephone number of the State Bar of California’s legal specialization program, or its equivalent].

(c) The completed claim form shall be filed with the employer by the injured employee, or, in the case of death, by a dependent of the injured employee, or by an agent of the employee or dependent. Except as provided in subdivision (d), a claim form is deemed filed when it is personally delivered to the employer or received by the employer by first-class or certified mail. A
 dated copy of the completed form shall be provided by the employer to the employer’s insurer and to the employee, dependent, or agent who filed the claim form.

(d) The claim form shall be filed with the employer prior to the injured employee’s entitlement to late payment supplements under subdivision (d) of Section 4650, or prior to the injured employee’s request for a medical evaluation under Section 4060, 4061, or 4062. Filing of the claim form with the employer shall toll, for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1994, the time limitations set forth in Sections 5405 and 5406 until the claim is denied by the employer or the injury becomes presumptively compensable pursuant to Section 5402. For purposes of this subdivision, a claim form is deemed filed when it is personally delivered to the employer or mailed to the employer by first-class or certified mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 544, Sec. 6.   (AB 335)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5401.7.

The claim form shall contain, prominently stated, the following statement:

“Any person who makes or causes to be made any knowingly false or fraudulent material statement or material representation for the purpose of obtaining or denying workers’ compensation benefits or payments is guilty of a felony.”

The statements required to be printed or displayed pursuant to Section 1871.2 of the Insurance Code may, but are not required to,
 appear on the claim form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 30.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5402.

(a) Knowledge of an injury, obtained from any source, on the part of an employer, the employer’s managing agent, superintendent, foreman, or other person in authority, or knowledge of the assertion of a claim of injury sufficient to afford opportunity to the employer to make an investigation into the facts, is equivalent to service under Section 5400.

(b) (1) If liability is not rejected within 90 days after the date the claim form is filed under Section 5401, the injury shall be presumed compensable under this division. The presumption of this subdivision is rebuttable only by evidence discovered subsequent to the 90-day period.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for injuries or illnesses defined in Sections 3212 to 3212.85, inclusive, and Sections 3212.9 to 3213.2, inclusive, if the liability is not rejected within 75 days after the date the claim form is filed pursuant to Section 5401, the injury shall be presumed compensable under this division. The presumption of this subdivision is rebuttable only by evidence discovered subsequent to the 75-day period.

(c) Within one working day after an employee files a claim form under Section 5401, the employer shall authorize the provision of all treatment, consistent with Section 5307.27, for the alleged injury and shall continue to provide the treatment until the date that liability for the claim is accepted or rejected. Until the date the claim is accepted or
 rejected, liability for medical treatment shall be limited to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(d) Treatment provided under subdivision (c) does not give rise to a presumption of liability on the part of the employer.

(e) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall identify and amend its existing data collection processes to include collection of the date on which the claimant is notified of acceptance, denial, or conditional denial of liability for a claim, consistent with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 835, Sec. 3.   (SB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5403.

The failure to give notice under section 5400, or any defect or inaccuracy in a notice is not a bar to recovery under this division if it is found as a fact in the proceedings for the collection of the claim that the employer was not in fact misled or prejudiced by such failure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5404.

Unless compensation is paid within the time limited in this chapter for the institution of proceedings for its collection, the right to institute such proceedings is barred. The timely filing of an application with the appeals board by any party in interest for any part of the compensation defined by Section 3207 renders this chapter inoperative as to all further claims by such party against the defendants therein named for compensation arising from that injury, and the right to present such further claims is governed by Sections 5803 to 5805, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5404.5.

(a) Where a claim form has been filed prior to January 1, 1994, and where the claim is denied by the employer, the claim may be dismissed if there has been no activity for the previous 180 days and if the claims adjuster has served notice pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The notice shall specify that the claim will be dismissed by operation of law unless an application for adjudication of the claim is filed within 180 days of service of the notice.

(b) Where a claim form has been filed prior to January 1, 1994, and where benefits have been furnished by the employer, the claim may be dismissed if there has been no activity for the previous 180 days and if the claims adjuster has served notice pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The notice shall specify that the claim will be dismissed by operation of law unless an application for adjudication of the claim is filed within five years of the date of injury or within one year of the last furnishing of benefits, whichever is later.

(c) The administrative director may adopt rules of practice and procedure consistent with this section.

(d) The provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) do not limit the jurisdiction of the appeals board.

(e) This section is applicable to injuries occurring before January 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5405.

The period within which proceedings may be commenced for the collection of the benefits provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 4650), or both, of Chapter 2 of Part 2 is one year from any of the following:

(a) The date of injury.

(b) The expiration of any period covered by payment under Article 3 (commencing with Section 4650) of Chapter 2 of Part 2.

(c) The last date on which any benefits provided for in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 were furnished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5406.

(a) Except as provided in Section 5406.5, 5406.6, or 5406.7, the period within which may be commenced proceedings for the collection of the benefits provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 4700) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 is one year from:

(1) The date of death if death occurs within one year from date of injury.

(2) The date of last furnishing of any benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4550) of Part 2, if death occurs more than one year from the date of injury.

(3) The date of death, if death occurs more than one year after the date of injury and compensation benefits have been
 furnished.

(b) Proceedings shall not be commenced more than one year after the date of death, nor more than 240 weeks from the date of injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 378.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5406.5.

In the case of the death of an asbestos worker or firefighter from asbestosis, the period within which proceedings may be commenced for the collection of the benefits provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 4700) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 is one year from the date of death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 831, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5406.6.

(a) In the case of the death of a health care worker, a worker described in Section 3212, or a worker described in Section 830.5 of the Penal Code from an HIV-related disease, the period within which proceedings may be commenced for the collection of benefits provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 4700) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 is one year from the date of death, providing that one or more of the following events has occurred:

(1) A report of the injury or exposure was made to the employer or to a governmental agency authorized to administer industrial injury claims, within one year of the date of the injury.

(2) The worker has complied with the notice provisions of this chapter and the claim has not been finally determined to be noncompensable.

(3) The employer provided, or was ordered to provide, workers’ compensation benefits for the injury prior to the date of death.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “health care worker” means an employee who has direct contact, in the course of his or her employment, with blood or other bodily fluids contaminated with blood, or with other bodily fluids identified by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health as capable of transmitting HIV, who is either (1) any person who is an employee of a provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, including, but not limited to, a registered nurse, licensed vocational nurse, certified nurse aide, clinical laboratory technologist, dental hygienist, physician,
 janitor, or housekeeping worker, or (2) an employee who provides direct patient care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 444, Sec. 21.   (SB 138)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5406.7.

(a) In addition to the timelines established pursuant to Section 5406, proceedings for the collection of the benefits provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 4700) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 may be commenced after 240 weeks from the date of injury and no later than 420 weeks from the date of injury, but in no event more than one year after the date of death, if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The proceedings are brought for the collection of benefits by, or on behalf of, a person who was a dependent on the date of death. The extent of dependency shall be determined in accordance with the facts as they existed at the time of death of the employee.

(2) The injury causing death is one of
 the following:

(A) An injury as defined in Section 3212.1 to a person described in Section 3212.1.

(B) An injury as defined in Section 3212.6 to a person described in Section 3212.6.

(C) An injury as defined in Section 3212.8 to a person described in Section 3212.8.

(3) The date of injury is during the person’s active service in applicable capacities described in Section 3212.1, 3212.6, or 3212.8.

(b) This section does not apply to claims for the collection of benefits pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4700) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 that have already been adjudicated, or otherwise finalized, or for which the commencement period lapsed on or before December 31, 2014.

(c) No dependency death benefit shall be payable pursuant to proceedings commenced more than 240 weeks from the date of injury unless either no proceedings were commenced within 240 weeks from the date of injury, or, if proceedings were commenced within that period, it has been finally determined that no person is entitled to dependency death benefits pursuant to the proceedings that were commenced within that period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 734, Sec. 2.   (SB 1086)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5407.

The period within which may be commenced proceedings for the collection of compensation on the ground of serious and willful misconduct of the employer, under provisions of Section 4553, is as follows:

Twelve months from the date of injury. This period shall not be extended by payment of compensation, agreement therefor, or the filing of application for compensation benefits under other provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

5407.5.

The period within which may be commenced proceedings for the reduction of compensation on the ground of serious and willful misconduct of the employee, under provisions of Section 4551, is as follows:

Twelve months from the date of injury. However, this limitation shall not apply in any case where the employee has commenced proceedings for the increase of compensation on the ground of serious and willful misconduct of the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

5408.

If an injured employee or, in the case of the employee’s death, any of the employee’s dependents, is under 18 years of age or incompetent at any time when any right or privilege accrues to such employee or dependent under this division, a guardian or conservator of the estate appointed by the court, or a guardian ad litem or trustee appointed by the appeals board, may, on behalf of the employee or dependent, claim and exercise any right or privilege with the same force and effect as if no disability existed.

No limitation of time provided by this division shall run against any person under 18 years of age or any incompetent unless and until a guardian or conservator of the estate or trustee is appointed. The appeals board may determine the fact of the minority or incompetency of any injured employee and may appoint a trustee to receive and disburse compensation payments for the benefit of such minor or incompetent and his family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

5409.

The running of the period of limitations prescribed by this chapter is an affirmative defense and operates to bar the remedy and not to extinguish the right of the employee. Such defense may be waived. Failure to present such defense prior to the submission of the cause for decision is a sufficient waiver.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5410.

Nothing in this chapter shall bar the right of any injured worker to institute proceedings for the collection of compensation within five years after the date of the injury upon the ground that the original injury has caused new and further disability. The jurisdiction of the appeals board in these cases shall be a continuing jurisdiction within this period. This section does not extend the limitation provided in Section 5407.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 217, Sec. 6.   (AB 2732)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5410.1.

Should any party to a proceeding institute proceedings to reduce the amount of permanent disability awarded to an applicant by the appeals board and be unsuccessful in such proceeding, the board may make a finding as to the amount of a reasonable attorney’s fee incurred by the applicant in resisting such proceeding to reduce permanent disability benefits previously awarded by the appeals board and assess the same as costs upon the party instituting the proceeding for the reduction of permanent disability benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1558.)
-------------------------------------------

5411.

The date of injury, except in cases of occupational disease or cumulative injury, is that date during the employment on which occurred the alleged incident or exposure, for the consequences of which compensation is claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1024.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.

The date of injury in cases of occupational diseases or cumulative injuries is that date upon which the employee first suffered disability therefrom and either knew, or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known, that such disability was caused by his present or prior employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1024.)
-------------------------------------------

5413.

A determination of facts by the appeals board under this chapter has no collateral estoppel effect on a subsequent criminal prosecution and does not preclude litigation of those same facts in the criminal proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 158, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.3. Workers’ Compensation—Truth in Advertising [5430. - 5434.]

5430.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Workers’ Compensation Truth in Advertising Act of 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 904, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5431.

The purpose of this chapter is to assure truthful and adequate disclosure of all material and relevant information in the advertising which solicits persons to file workers’ compensation claims or to engage or consult counsel or a medical care provider or clinic to consider a workers’ compensation claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 904, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5432.

(a) Any advertisement which solicits persons to file workers’ compensation claims or to engage or consult counsel or a medical care provider or clinic to consider a workers’ compensation claim in any newspaper, magazine, circular, form letter, or open publication, published, distributed, or circulated in this state, or on any billboard, card, label, transit advertisement or other written advertising medium shall state at the top or bottom on the front side or surface of the document in at least 12-point roman boldface type font, except for any billboard which shall be in type whose letters are 12 inches in height or any transit advertisement which shall be in type whose letters are seven inches in height and for any television announcement which shall be in 12-point roman boldface type font and appear in a dark background and remain on the screen for a minimum of five seconds and for any radio announcement which shall be read at an understandable pace with no loud music or sound effects, or both, to compete for the listener’s attention, the following:NOTICEMaking a false or fraudulent workers’ compensation claim is a felony subject to up to 5 years in prison or a fine of up to $50,000 or double the value of the fraud, whichever is greater, or by both imprisonment and fine.
(b) Any television or radio announcement published or disseminated in this state which solicits persons to file workers’ compensation claims or to engage or consult counsel to consider a workers’ compensation claim under this code shall include the following spoken statement by the announcer of the advertisement:
“Making a false or fraudulent workers’ compensation claim is a felony subject to up to 5 years in prison or a fine of up to $50,000 or double the value of the fraud, whichever is greater, or by both imprisonment and fine.”
(c) This chapter does not supersede or repeal any regulation which governs advertising under this code and those regulations shall continue to be in force in addition to this chapter.

(d) For purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), the notice or statement shall be written or spoken in English. In those cases where the preponderance of the listening or reading public receives information other than in the English language, the written notice or spoken statement shall be in those other languages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 904, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5433.

(a) Any advertisement or other device designed to produce leads based on a response from a person to file a workers’ compensation claim or to engage or consult counsel or a medical care provider or clinic shall disclose that an agent may contact the individual if that is the fact. In addition, an individual who makes contact with a person as a result of acquiring that individual’s name from a lead generating device shall disclose that fact in the initial contact with that person.

(b) No person shall solicit persons to file a workers’ compensation claim or to engage or consult counsel or a medical care provider or clinic to consider a workers’ compensation claim through the use of a true or fictitious name which is deceptive or misleading with regard to the status, character, or proprietary or representative capacity of the entity or person, or to the true purpose of the advertisement.

(c) For purposes of this section, an advertisement includes a solicitation in any newspaper, magazine, circular, form letter, or open publication, published, distributed, or circulated in this state, or on any billboard, card, label, transit advertisement, or other written advertising medium, and includes envelopes, stationery, business cards, or other material designed to encourage the filing of a workers’ compensation claim.

(d) Advertisements shall not employ words, initials, letters, symbols, or other devices which are so similar to those used by governmental agencies, a nonprofit or charitable institution, or other entity that they could have the capacity or tendency to mislead the public. Examples of misleading materials include, but are not limited to, those that imply any of the following:

(1) The advertisement is in some way provided by or is endorsed by a governmental agency or charitable institution.

(2) The advertiser is the same as, is connected with, or is endorsed by a governmental agency or charitable institution.

(e) Advertisements may not use the name of a state or political subdivision thereof in an advertising solicitation.

(f) Advertisements may not use any name, service mark, slogan, symbol, or any device in any manner which implies that the advertiser, or any person or entity associated with the advertiser, or that any agency who may call upon the person in response to the advertisement, is connected with a governmental agency.

(g) Advertisements may not imply that the reader, listener, or viewer may lose a right or privilege or benefits under federal, state, or local law if he or she fails to respond to the advertisement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5434.

(a) Any advertiser who violates Section 5431 or 5432 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “advertiser” means any person who provides workers’ compensation claims services which are described in the written or broadcast advertisements, any person to whom persons solicited by the advertisements are directed to for inquiries or the provision of workers’ compensation claims related services, or any person paying for the preparation, broadcast, printing, dissemination, or placement of the advertisements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 904, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Administrative Assistance [5450. - 5455.]

5450.

The Division of Workers’ Compensation shall make available to employees, employers and other interested parties information, assistance, and advice to assure the proper and timely furnishing of benefits and to assist in the resolution of disputes on an informal basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5451.

Any party may consult with, or seek the advice of, an information and assistance officer within the Division of Workers’ Compensation as designated by the administrative director. If no application is filed, if the employee is not represented, or upon agreement of the parties, the information and assistance officer shall consider the contentions of the parties and may refer the matter to the appropriate bureau or unit within the Division of Workers’ Compensation for review and recommendations. The information and assistance officer shall advise the employer and the employee of their rights, benefits, and obligations under this division. Upon making a referral, the information and assistance officer shall arrange for a copy of any pertinent material submitted to be served upon the parties or their representatives, if any. The procedures to be followed by the information and assistance officer shall be governed by the rules and regulations of the administrative director adopted after public hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5453.

After consideration of the information submitted, including the reports of any bureau or unit within the Division of Workers’ Compensation which have been received, the information and assistance officer shall make a recommendation which shall be served on the parties or their representatives, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5454.
